ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Echipamente de birou: Accesorii pentru calculatoare; Calculatoare; Dicționare electronice și programe de tradus; Dispozitive pentru etichetat; Dispozitive pentru laminare; Distrugătoare de documente pentru birou; Mașini de francare; Dispozitive de pontaj; Sisteme de transcriere și dictare; Mașini de scris
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์สำหรับสำนักงาน: อุปกรณ์เครื่องคิดเลข; เครื่องคิดเลข; พจนานุกรมและเครื่องแปลแบบอิเล็กทรอนิกส์; เครื่องทำป้ายเลเบล; เครื่องเคลือบบัตร; เครื่องทำลายเอกสาร; เครื่องวัดไปรษณียากร; นาฬิกาตอกบัตร; เครื่องถอดความและระบบการเขียนตามคำบอก; เครื่องพิมพ์ดีด
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske vybavenie: Príslušenstva pre kalkulačky; Kalkulačky; Elektronické slovníky a prekladače; Štítkovače; Laminovacie zariadenia; Kancelárske skartovačky; Razítkovacie stroje; Dochádzkové hodiny; Prepisovače a diktovacie systémy; Písacie stroje
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovarusteet: Laskimien lisätarvikkeet; Laskimet; Elektroniset sanakirjat ja kääntäjät; Tarratulostimet; Laminointikoneet; Silppurit; Postileimakoneet; Aika ja kellokortit; Litterointi- ja sanelinjärjestelmät; Kirjoituskoneet
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsutrustning: Räknartillbehör; Räknemaskiner; Elektroniska ordböcker och översättare; Präglingsapparater; Laminatorer; Dokumentförstörare; Frankeringsmaskiner; Tids- och närvaroklockor; Transkriberare och diktationssystem; Skrivmaskiner
de: Bürobedarf > Bürogeräte: Taschenrechner-Zubehör; Taschenrechner; Elektronische Wörterbücher & Übersetzungsgeräte; Etikettendrucker; Laminiergeräte; Aktenvernichter; Frankiermaschinen; Stempeluhren; Diktiergeräte & Geräte zur Transkription; Schreibmaschinen
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公设备: 计算器配件; 计算器; 电子词典/翻译工具; 标签打印机; 压膜机; 办公室碎纸机; 邮资计算器; 考勤钟; 转录器与录音系统; 打字机
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Equipamento para escritório: Acessórios para calculadora; Calculadoras; Dicionários e tradutores eletrônicos; Impressoras de etiquetas; Laminadores; Picadores; Máquinas de franquear; Relógios de ponto; Transcritores e sistemas de ditado; Máquinas de escrever
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai berendezések: Számológép-kiegészítők; Számológépek; Elektronikus szótárak és fordítók; Címkekészítők; Laminálók; Irodai iratmegsemmisítők; Postamérők; Idő- és jelenléti órák; Átírók és diktáló rendszerek; Írógépek
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисная техника: Аксессуары для калькуляторов; Калькуляторы; Электронные словари и переводчики; Принтеры для печати наклеек; Ламинаторы; Офисные шредеры; Франкировальные машины; Устройства для учета рабочего времени; Устройства записи и расшифровки речи; Пишущие машинки
es: Material de oficina > Equipos para oficina: Accesorios para calculadoras; Calculadoras; Traductores y diccionarios electrónicos; Etiquetadoras; Plastificadoras; Trituradoras de papel; Máquinas franqueadoras; Relojes de fichar; Transcriptores y sistemas de dictados; Máquinas de escribir
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Thiết bị văn phòng: Phụ kiện máy tính cầm tay; Máy tính giải toán; Kim từ điển; Máy in nhãn; Máy cán; Máy hủy tài liệu văn phòng; Máy đóng dấu bưu điện; Đồng hồ tính giờ và chấm công; Hệ thống ghi chép âm thanh thành văn bản; Máy đánh chữ
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис оборудване: Аксесоари за калкулатори; Калкулатори; Електронни речници и преводачи; Устройства за етикети; Ламинатори; Офис шредери; Франкиращи машини; Часовници за време и за отчитане на работното време; Устройства за транскрибиране и системи за диктовка; Пишещи машини
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sprzęt biurowy: Akcesoria do kalkulatorów; Kalkulatory; Słowniki i translatory elektroniczne; Drukarki do etykiet; Laminatory; Niszczarki; Frankownice; Rejestratory czasu pracy; Transkrybery i systemy dyktowania; Maszyny do pisania
en: Office Supplies > Office Equipment: Calculator Accessories; Calculators; Electronic Dictionaries & Translators; Label Makers; Laminators; Office Shredders; Postage Meters; Time & Attendance Clocks; Transcribers & Dictation Systems; Typewriters
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Equipamento de escritório: Acessórios para calculadora; Calculadoras; Dicionários e tradutores eletrónicos; Rotuladoras; Laminadoras; Trituradoras de papel; Máquina de franquear; Sistemas de controlo de presença e acesso; Sistemas de transcrição e gravação; Máquinas de escrever
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorapparaten: Accessoires voor rekenmachines; Rekenmachines; Elektronische woordenboeken en vertaalcomputers; Labelmakers; Lamineerapparaten; Papierversnipperaars; Frankeermachines; Tijd- en prikklokken; Transcriptieapparaten en dictafoons; Typemachines
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기기: 계산기 부대용품; 계산기; 전자 사전/번역기; 라벨기; 코팅기; 문서 파쇄기; 우편 요금 측정기; 근무 시간/출결 관리 시계; 전사/받아쓰기 시스템; 타자기
it: Forniture per ufficio > Dotazione per l'ufficio: Accessori per calcolatrici; Calcolatrici; Dizionari e traduttori elettronici; Etichettatrici; Laminatori; Distruggidocumenti; Affrancatrici; Macchine timbracartellini; Trascrittori e sistemi di dettatura; Macchine da scrivere
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorudstyr: Tilbehør til lommeregnere; Regnemaskiner; Elektroniske ordbøger og oversættere; Labelmaskiner; Lamineringsmaskiner; Makuleringsmaskiner; Portomaskiner; Stempelure; Transskribering og diktafoner; Skrivemaskiner
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredska oprema: Pribor za kalkulator; Kalkulatori; Elektronički rječnici i prevoditelji; Pisač naljepnica; Laminatori; Uništavači dokumentacije; Strojevi za poštansko frankiranje; Satovi za evidenciju radnog vremena; Prepisivači i sustavi za diktiranje; Pisaći strojevi
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Ekipmanları: Hesap Makinesi Aksesuarları; Hesap Makineleri; Elektronik Sözlükler ve Çevirmenler; Etiket Yazıcılar; Laminasyon Makineleri; Evrak İmha Makineleri; Posta Pulu Yapıştırma Makineleri; Süre ve Katılım Saatleri; Transkripsiyon ve Dikte Sistemleri; Daktilolar
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské vybavení: Příslušenství ke kalkulačkám; Kalkulačky; Elektronické slovníky a překladače; Štítkovače; Laminátory; Skartovačky; Frankovací přístroje; Zařízení na sledování docházky; Přepisovače a diktovací systémy; Psací stroje
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniška oprema: Dodatki za kalkulatorje; Kalkulatorji; Elektronski slovarji in prevajalniki; Izdelovalci etiket; Plastifikatorji; Uničevalniki dokumentov; Poštni števci; Naprave za beleženje delovnega časa; Prepisovalci in sistemi za narekovanje; Pisalni stroji
ja: オフィス用品 > オフィス機器: 電卓関連用品; 電卓; 電子辞書; ラベルプリンター; ラミネーター; シュレッダー; 郵便料金計器; タイムレコーダー; 転写機; タイプライター
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Εξοπλισμός γραφείου: Αξεσουάρ αριθμομηχανής; Αριθμομηχανές; Ηλεκτρονικά λεξικά & μεταφραστές; Συσκευές δημιουργίας ετικετών; Πλαστικοποιητές; Καταστροφείς εγγράφων γραφείου; Ταχυδρομικοί μετρητές; Ώρα & ρολόγια παρουσίας; Συσκευές απομαγνητοφώνησης & υπαγόρευσης; Γραφομηχανές
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Équipement de bureau: Accessoires pour calculatrices; Calculatrices; Dictionnaires et traducteurs électroniques; Étiqueteuses; Plastifieuses; Destructeurs de documents; Affranchisseuses; Horloges et pointeuses; Transcripteurs et dictaphones; Machines à écrire
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorutstyr: Kalkulatortilbehør; Kalkulatorer; Elektroniske dagbøker og oversettere; Etikettmaskiner; Laminatorer; Makuleringsmaskiner; Frankeringsmaskiner; Tids- og oppmøteklokker; Transkriberings- og diktatsystemer; Skrivemaskiner
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro įranga: Skaičiuotuvų priedai; Skaičiuotuvai; Elektroniniai žodynai ir vertimo įrenginiai; Etikečių spausdintuvai; Laminatoriai; Biuro smulkintuvai; Frankavimo mašinos; Laiko ir lankomumo laikrodžiai; Transkribavimo ir diktavimo sistemos; Rašomosios mašinėlės
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 辦公室設備: 計算機配件; 計算機; 電子辭典/翻譯機; 標籤機; 護貝機; 碎紙機; 自動郵資蓋印機; 打卡鐘; 轉錄器/錄音機; 打字機